Alabama, session 2026rs, HB439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-27-234, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-27-234
(a) On or after May 18, 2020Beginning June 1, 2026, a
person an individual qualifying for election as Sheriff of
Escambia County or any person individual appointed to serve as
a sheriff shall meet all of the following minimum
qualifications, in addition to any other qualifications
required by law:
(1) The person individual is a citizen of the United
States.
(2) The person individual has been a resident of the
county for at least one year immediately prior to the
qualification date.
(3) The person individual has the qualifications of an
elector pursuant to state and federal law and the person has
been registered to vote in the county at least one year
immediately prior to qualifying.
(4) The person individual has been awarded a high
school diploma or a GED equivalent.
(5) The person individual is 25 years of age or older
prior to qualifying.
Page 1

prior to qualifying.
HB439 Enrolled
(6) The person individual has three or more years of
full-time prior service as a law enforcement officer having
the power of arrest, which service is certified by the Alabama
Peace Officers' Standards and Training Commission, and the
person has not been retired or separated from full-time active
law enforcement certified through the Alabama Peace Officers'
Standards and Training Commission for more than two
consecutive years one year from the date of qualifying, or in
the event the person individual has been retired or separated
from active law enforcement for more than two consecutive
yearsone year, the person individual has obtained a
recertification of full-time active law enforcement status as
a law enforcement officer from the Alabama Peace Officers'
Standards and Training Commission prior to the date of
qualifying. In addition, if the individual has ever retired
from active law enforcement, he or she has three or more years
of full-time post-retirement law enforcement service prior to
the date of qualifying.
(7) The person individual has never been convicted of a
felony criminal offense in this state or convicted of a
criminal offense in another jurisdiction where a conviction of
the offense would be considered a felony offense in this
state.
(b) Upon election, the sheriff of the county shall
attend annually a minimum of 12 hours of executive level
continuing education approved by the Alabama Sheriff'sSheriffs
Association, National Sheriff'sSheriffs' Association, or any
other recognized executive level continuing education program
Page 2

other recognized executive level continuing education program
HB439 Enrolled
designed for law enforcement."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB439 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 19-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 25-Feb-26 Passed



Page 4